Utah statutes.
53A-11-1004.   Liability for release of information.

(1)  The district superintendent, principal, and any staff member notified by the principal may not be held liable for information which may become public knowledge unless it can be shown by clear and convincing evidence that the information became public knowledge through an intentional act of the superintendent, principal, or a staff member.

(2)  A person receiving information under Subsection 78A-6-112(3)(b), 78A-6-117(1)(b), or Section 53A-11-1002 is immune from any liability, civil or criminal, for acting or failing to act in response to the information unless the person acts or fails to act due to malice, gross negligence, or deliberate indifference to the consequences.

